Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 33 Health Records

Cross references.

Temporary medical consent guardianship, §

29-4-18

.

Editor’s notes.

Chapter 32 was added to Title 31 by both Ga. L. 1984, p. 1477, § 1, and by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1680, § 1. The former is set out as Chapter 32 and the latter was redesignated as Chapter 33 by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Patient referrals and patient records, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Board of Chiropractic Examiners, Immoral and Unprofessional Conduct Defined, § 100-7-.07.

Unprofessional conduct defined, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Board of Dentistry, § 150-8-.01.

Unprofessional conduct defined, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Board of Podiatry Examiners, § 500-8-.01.

31-33-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Patient” means any person who has received health care services from a provider.

“Provider” means all hospitals, including public, private, osteopathic, and tuberculosis hospitals; other special care units, including podiatric facilities, skilled nursing facilities, and kidney disease treatment centers, including freestanding hemodialysis units; intermediate care facilities; ambulatory surgical or obstetrical facilities; health maintenance organizations; and home health agencies. It shall also mean any person licensed to practice under Chapter 9, 11, 26, 34, 35, or 39 of Title 43.

“Record” means a patient’s health record, including, but not limited to, evaluations, diagnoses, prognoses, laboratory reports, X-rays, prescriptions, and other technical information used in assessing the patient’s condition, or the pertinent portion of the record relating to a specific condition or a summary of the record.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1680, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-33-1

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-33-2.
Furnishing copy of records to patient, provider, or other authorized person.

A provider having custody and control of any evaluation, diagnosis, prognosis, laboratory report, or biopsy slide in a patient’s record shall retain such item for a period of not less than ten years from the date such item was created.

The requirements of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not apply to:

An individual provider who has retired from or sold his or her professional practice if such provider has notified the patient of such retirement or sale and offered to provide such items in the patient’s record or copies thereof to another provider of the patient’s choice and, if the patient so requests, to the patient; or

A hospital which is an institution as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (4) of Code Section 31-7-1, which shall retain patient records in accordance with rules and regulations for hospitals as issued pursuant to Code Section 31-7-2.

Upon written request from the patient or a person authorized to have access to the patient’s record under an advance directive for health care, a psychiatric advance directive, or a durable power of attorney for health care for such patient, the provider having custody and control of the patient’s record shall furnish a complete and current copy of that record, in accordance with the provisions of this Code section. If the patient is deceased, such request may be made by the following persons:

The executor, administrator, or temporary administrator for the decedent’s estate if such person has been appointed;

If an executor, administrator, or temporary administrator for the decedent’s estate has not been appointed, by the surviving spouse;

If there is no surviving spouse, by any surviving child; and

If there is no surviving child, by any parent.

Any record requested under subsection (a) of this Code section shall within 30 days of the receipt of a request for records be furnished to the patient, any other provider designated by the patient, any person authorized by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section to request a patient’s or deceased patient’s medical records, or any other person designated by the patient. Such record request shall be accompanied by:

An authorization in compliance with the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42 U.S.C. Section 1320d-2, et seq., and regulations implementing such act; and

A signed written authorization as specified in subsection (d) of this Code section.

If the provider reasonably determines that disclosure of the record to the patient will be detrimental to the physical or mental health of the patient, the provider may refuse to furnish the record; however, upon such refusal, the patient’s record shall, upon written request by the patient, be furnished to any other provider designated by the patient.

A provider shall not be required to release records in accordance with this Code section unless and until the requesting person has furnished the provider with a signed written authorization indicating that he or she is authorized to have access to the patient’s records by paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section. Any provider shall be justified in relying upon such written authorization.

Any provider or person who in good faith releases copies of medical records in accordance with this Code section shall not be found to have violated any criminal law or to be civilly liable to the patient, the deceased patient’s estate, or to any other person.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1680, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-33-2

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1157, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 641, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 494, § 3/HB 912; Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 13/HB 24; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-32/SB 433; Ga. L. 2022, p. 611, § 2-17/HB 752.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “, a psychiatric advance directive,” in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “and” was added at the end of subparagraph (a)(2)(C), in subsection (b), a comma was deleted following “Code section shall” in the introductory language, and “section” was substituted for “Section” in paragraph (b)(2).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, “by the department” was deleted following “hospitals as issued” in division (a)(1)(B)(ii).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2007, p. 133, § 1/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “(a) The General Assembly has long recognized the right of the individual to control all aspects of his or her personal care and medical treatment, including the right to insist upon medical treatment, decline medical treatment, or direct that medical treatment be withdrawn.
In order to secure these rights, the General Assembly has adopted and amended statutes recognizing the living will and health care agency and provided statutory forms for both documents.

“(b) The General Assembly has determined that the statutory forms for the living will and durable power of attorney for health care are confusing and inconsistent and that the statutes providing for the living will and health care agency contain conflicting concepts, inconsistent and out-of-date terminology, and confusing and inconsistent requirements for execution. In addition, there is a commendable trend among the states to combine the concepts of the living will and health care agency into a single legal document.

“(c) The General Assembly recognizes that a significant number of individuals representing the academic, medical, legislative, and legal communities, state officials, ethics scholars, and advocacy groups worked together to develop the advance directive for health care contained in this Act, and the collective intent was to create a form that uses understandable and everyday language in order to encourage more citizens of this state to execute advance directives for health care.

“(d) The General Assembly finds that the clear expression of an individual’s decisions regarding health care, whether made by the individual or an agent appointed by the individual, is of critical importance not only to citizens but also to the health care and legal communities, third parties, and families. In furtherance of these purposes, the General Assembly enacts a new Chapter 32 of Title 31, setting forth general principles governing the expression of decisions regarding health care and the appointment of a health care agent, as well as a form of advance directive for health care.”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 200 (2002).

For article, “What Every Attorney Should Know About Health Care Law,”
see 15 (No. 6) Ga. St. B. J. 17 (2010).

31-33-3.
Costs of copying and mailing; patient’s rights as to records; applicability to psychiatric, psychological, and other mental health records.

The party requesting the patient’s records shall be responsible to the provider for the costs of copying and mailing the patient’s record. A charge of up to $20.00 may be collected for search, retrieval, and other direct administrative costs related to compliance with the request under this chapter. A fee for certifying the medical records may also be charged not to exceed $7.50 for each record certified. The actual cost of postage incurred in mailing the requested records may also be charged. In addition, copying costs for a record which is in paper form shall not exceed $.75 per page for the first 20 pages of the patient’s records which are copied; $.65 per page for pages 21 through 100; and $.50 for each page copied in excess of 100 pages. All of the fees allowed by this Code section may be adjusted annually in accordance with the medical component of the consumer price index. The Department of Community Health shall be responsible for calculating this annual adjustment, which will become effective on July 1 of each year. To the extent the request for medical records includes portions of records which are not in paper form, including but not limited to radiology films, models, or fetal monitoring strips, the provider shall be entitled to recover the full reasonable cost of such reproduction. Payment of such costs may be required by the provider prior to the records being furnished. This subsection shall not apply to records requested in order to make or complete an application for a disability benefits program.

The rights granted to a patient or other person under this chapter are in addition to any other rights such patient or person may have relating to access to a patient’s records; however, nothing in this chapter shall be construed as granting to a patient or person any right of ownership in the records, as such records are owned by and are the property of the provider.

This Code section shall apply to psychiatric, psychological, and other mental health records of a patient.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1680, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-33-3

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1157, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 949, § 1/HB 385; Ga. L. 2016, p. 549, § 1/HB 910.

Law reviews.

For article, “Trial Practice and Procedure,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 475 (2001).

For survey article on workers’ compensation law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 433 (2008).

31-33-4.
Mental health records.

The provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided in Code Sections 31-33-3, 31-33-7, and 31-33-8, shall not apply to psychiatric, psychological, or other mental health records of a patient.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1680, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-33-4

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 18/SB 244; Ga. L. 2016, p. 549, § 2/HB 910.

Cross references.

Right of mental patients to examine medical records, §§

37-3-162

,

37-3-167

.

31-33-5.
Immunity from liability for releasing information.

Any provider releasing information in good faith pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall not be civilly or criminally liable to the patient, guardian, parent, or any other person for such release.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1680, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-33-5

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-33-6.
Confidential communications.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as destroying or diminishing the privileged or confidential nature of any communication now or hereafter recognized by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-32-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1680, § 1; Code 1981, §

31-33-6

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31.

31-33-7.
Furnishing copies of psychological or psychiatric evaluation to law enforcement officer upon request.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 31-33-4, if a law enforcement officer employed by a governmental entity is required to submit to a psychological or psychiatric examination for the purpose of assessing the law enforcement officer’s fitness for duty, employment status, or assignment of duties, then, upon the written request of the law enforcement officer, the employer shall furnish to the law enforcement officer a complete copy of the evaluation or report.

Any employer or health care provider furnishing or making a report or evaluation in good faith pursuant to the provisions of this Code section shall not be civilly or criminally liable to the law enforcement officer or any other person for furnishing or making such report or evaluation.

If an employer reasonably determines that disclosure of the evaluation or report to the law enforcement officer will be detrimental to the mental health of the law enforcement officer, would present a risk of harm to other persons, would involve the disclosure of confidential information or would violate the privacy of a third party, then the employer may refuse to furnish the record of evaluation; provided, however, that upon such refusal the evaluation or report shall, upon written request by the law enforcement officer, be furnished by the employer to a psychiatrist or psychologist treating the law enforcement officer.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-33-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1499, § 1.

Cross references.

Employment and training of peace officers, T. 35, C. 8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, “; provided,” was substituted for “provided; ” in subsection (c).

31-33-8.
Electronic records; application to psychiatric, psychological, or other mental health records.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law to the contrary, any provider may, in its sole discretion, create, maintain, transmit, receive, and store records in an electronic format within the meaning of Code Section 10-12-2 and may, in its sole discretion, temporarily or permanently convert records into an electronic format.

A provider shall not be required to maintain separate tangible copies of electronically stored records.

The other provisions of this chapter shall apply to electronic records to the same extent as those provisions apply to tangible records.

This Code section is subject to all applicable federal laws governing the security and confidentiality of a patient’s personal health information.

A tangible copy of a record reproduced from an electronically stored record shall be considered an original for purposes of providing copies to patients or other authorized parties and for introduction of the records into evidence in administrative or court proceedings.

Except as provided otherwise under federal law, upon receiving a request for a copy of a record from a patient or an authorized person under Code Section 31-33-3, a provider shall provide copies of the record in either tangible or electronically stored form.

Subsections (a), (b), (d) and (e) of this Code section shall apply to psychiatric, psychological, or other mental health records of a patient.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-33-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 618, § 1/SB 204; Ga. L. 2009, p. 698, § 4/HB 126; Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 19/SB 244.

Cross references.

Georgia Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, §

10-12-1

et seq.